North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 49B. Meat Inspection Requirements; Adulteration and Misbranding.

§ 106-549.15.
Definitions.

As used in this Article, except as otherwise specified, the following terms shall have the meanings stated below:

“Adulterated” shall apply to any carcass, part thereof, meat or meat food product under one or more of the following circumstances:

If it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render it injurious to health; but in case the substance is not an added substance, such article shall not be considered adulterated under this clause if the quantity of such substance in or on such article does not ordinarily render it injurious to health;

1. If it bears or contains (by reason of administration of any substance to the live animal or otherwise) any added poisonous or added deleterious substance (other than one which is (i) a pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity; (ii) a food additive; or (iii) a color additive) which may, in the judgment of the Commissioner, make such article unfit for human food;

2.

If it is, in whole or in part, a raw agricultural commodity and such commodity bears or contains a pesticide chemical which is unsafe within the meaning of section 408 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

3.

If it bears or contains any food additive which is unsafe within the meaning of section 409 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

4.

If it bears or contains any color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of section 721 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act: Provided, that an article which is not adulterated under clause 2, 3, or 4 shall nevertheless be deemed adulterated if use of the pesticide chemical, food additive or color additive in or on such article is prohibited by order of the Commissioner in establishments at which inspection is maintained under this Article;

If it consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance or is for any other reason unsound, unhealthful, unwholesome, or otherwise unfit for human food;

If it has been prepared, packed, or held under insanitary conditions whereby it may have become contaminated with filth, or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health;

If it is, in whole or in part, the product of an animal which has died otherwise than by slaughter;

If its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents injurious to health;

If it has been intentionally subjected to radiation, unless the use of the radiation was in conformity with a regulation or exemption in effect pursuant to section 409 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

If any valuable constituent has been in whole or in part omitted or abstracted therefrom; or if any substance has been substituted, wholly or in part therefor; or if damage or inferiority has been concealed in any manner; or if any substance has been added thereto or mixed or packed therewith so as to increase its bulk or weight, or reduce its quality or strength, or make it appear better or of greater value than it is; or

If it is margarine containing animal fat and any of the raw material used therein consist in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance.

“Animal food manufacturer” means any person, firm, or corporation engaged in the business of manufacturing or processing animal food derived wholly or in part from carcasses, or parts or products of the carcasses, of cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, mules, or other equines.

“Authorized representative” means the Director of the Meat and Poultry Inspection Service of the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

“Board” means the North Carolina Board of Agriculture.

“Capable of use as human food” shall apply to any carcass, or part or product of a carcass, of any animal, unless it is denatured or otherwise identified as required by regulations prescribed by the Board to deter its use as human food, or it is naturally inedible by humans.

“Commissioner” means the North Carolina Commissioner of Agriculture or his authorized representative.

“Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act” means the act so entitled, approved June 25, 1938 (52 Stat. 1040), and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto.

“Federal Meat Inspection Act” means the act so entitled approved March 4, 1907 (34 Stat. 1260), as amended by the Wholesome Meat Act (81 Stat. 584).

“Firm” means any partnership, association, or other unincorporated business organization.

“Intrastate commerce” means commerce within this State.

“Label” means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon the immediate container (not including package liners) of any article.

“Labeling” means all labels and other written, printed, or graphic matter (i) upon any article or any of its containers or wrappers, or (ii) accompanying such article.

“Meat broker” means any person, firm, corporation engaged in the business of buying or selling carcasses, parts of carcasses, meat, or meat food products of cattle, sheep, swine, goats, bison, horses, mules, or other equines on commission, or otherwise negotiating purchases or sales of such articles other than for his own account or as an employee of another person, firm, or corporation.

“Meat food product” means any product capable of use as human food that is made wholly or in part from any meat or other portion of the carcass of any cattle, sheep, swine, goats, bison, fallow deer, or red deer, excepting products that contain meat or other portions of such carcasses only in a relatively small proportion or historically have not been considered by consumers as products of the meat food industry, and that are exempted from definition as a meat food product by the Board under such conditions as it may prescribe to assure that the meat or other portions of such carcasses contained in such product are not adulterated and that such products are not represented as meat food products. This term as applied to food products of equines shall have a meaning comparable to that provided in this subdivision with respect to cattle, sheep, swine, goats, and bison.

“Misbranded” shall apply to any carcass, part thereof, meat or meat food product under one or more of the following circumstances:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;

If it is offered for sale under the name of another food;

If it is imitation of another food, unless its label bears, in type of uniform size and prominence, the word “imitation” and immediately thereafter, the name of the food imitated;

If its container is so made, formed, or filled as to be misleading;

If in a package or other container unless it bears a label showing (i) the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; and (ii) an accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count; provided, that under clause (ii) of this paragraph e, reasonable variations may be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages may be established, by regulations prescribed by the Board;

If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this or the subsequent Article to appear on the label or other labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness (as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices, in the labeling) and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use;

If it purports to be or is represented as a food for which a definition and standard of identity or composition has been prescribed by regulations of the Board under

G.S. 106-549.21

unless (i) it conforms to such definition and standard, and (ii) its label bears the name of the food specified in the definition and standard and, insofar as may be required by such regulations, the common names of optional ingredients (other than spices, flavoring, and coloring) present in such food;

If it purports to be or is represented as a food for which a standard or standards of fill of container have been prescribed by regulations of the Board under

G.S. 106-549.21

, and it falls below the standard of fill of container applicable thereto, unless its label bears, in such manner and form as such regulations specify, a statement that it falls below such standard;

If it is not subject to the provisions of paragraph g, unless its label bears (i) the common or usual name of the food, if any there be, and (ii) in case it is fabricated from two or more ingredients, the common or usual name of each such ingredient; except that spices, flavorings, and colorings may, when authorized by the Commissioner, be designated as spices, flavorings, and colorings without naming each: Provided, that, to the extent that compliance with the requirements of clause (ii) of this paragraph i is impracticable, or results in deception or unfair competition, exemptions shall be established by regulations promulgated by the Board;

If it purports to be or is represented for special dietary uses, unless its label bears such information concerning its vitamin, mineral, and other dietary properties as the Board determines to be, and by regulations prescribes as, necessary in order fully to inform purchasers as to its value for such uses;

If it bears or contains any artificial flavoring, artificial coloring, or chemical preservatives, unless it bears labeling stating that fact: Provided, that, to the extent that compliance with the requirements of this paragraph k is impracticable, exemptions shall be established by regulations promulgated by the Board; or

If it fails to bear, directly thereon or on its container, as the Board may by regulations prescribe, the inspection legend and, unrestricted by any of the foregoing, such other information as the Board may require in such regulations to assure that it will not have false or misleading labeling and that the public will be informed of the manner of handling required to maintain the article in a wholesome condition.

“Official certificate” means any certificate prescribed by regulations of the Board for issuance by an inspector or other person performing official functions under this or the subsequent Article.

“Official device” means any device prescribed or authorized by the Board for use in applying any official mark.

“Official inspection legend” means any symbol prescribed by regulations of the Board showing that an article was inspected and passed in accordance with this or the subsequent Article.

“Official mark” means the official inspection legend or any other symbol prescribed by regulations of the Board to identify the status of any article or animal under this or the subsequent Article.

“Pesticide chemical,” “food additive,” “color additive,” and “raw agricultural commodity” shall have the same meanings for purposes of this Article as under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

“Prepared” means slaughtered, canned, salted, smoked, rendered, boned, cut up, or otherwise manufactured or processed.

(21a)

“Ratite” means a bird whose breastbone is smooth so that flight muscles cannot attach, such as an ostrich, an emu, and a rhea. These birds are subject to the provisions of this Article and Article 49C to the same extent as any other meat food product.

“Renderer” means any person, firm, or corporation engaged in the business of rendering carcasses, or parts or products of the carcasses, of cattle, sheep, swine, goats, fallow deer, red deer, horses, mules, or other equines, except rendering conducted under inspection under this Article.

History.

1969, c. 893, s. 1; 1991, c. 317, ss. 4, 5; 1993, c. 311, s. 1; 1995, c. 194, ss. 1, 2; 1997-142, ss. 4, 5; 1997-261, s. 58; 2017-108, s. 11(a).

§ 106-549.16.
Statement of purpose.

Meat and meat food products are an important source of the nation’s total supply of food. It is essential in the public interest that the health and welfare of consumers be protected by assuring that meat and meat food products distributed to them are wholesome, not adulterated, and properly marked, labeled, and packaged. Unwholesome, adulterated, or misbranded meat or meat food products are injurious to the public welfare, destroy markets for wholesome, not adulterated, and properly labeled and packaged meat and meat food products, and results in sundry losses to livestock producers and processors of meat and meat food products, as well as injury to consumers. The unwholesome, adulterated, mislabeled, or deceptively packaged articles can be sold at lower prices and compete unfairly with the wholesome, not adulterated, and properly labeled and packaged articles, to the detriment of consumers and the public generally. It is hereby found that regulation by the Board and cooperation by North Carolina and the United States as contemplated by this and the subsequent Article are appropriate to protect the health and welfare of consumers and otherwise effectuate the purposes of this and the subsequent Article.

History.

1969, c. 893, s. 2; 1971, c. 54, s. 3.

§ 106-549.17.
Inspection of animals before slaughter; humane methods of slaughtering.

For the purpose of preventing the use in intrastate commerce, as hereinafter provided, of meat and meat food products which are adulterated, the Commissioner shall cause to be made, by inspectors appointed for that purpose, an examination and inspection of all cattle, sheep, swine, goats, fallow deer, red deer, bison, horses, mules, and other equines before they shall be allowed to enter into any slaughtering, packing, meat-canning, rendering, or similar establishment in this State in which slaughtering and preparation of meat and meat food products of such animals are conducted for intrastate commerce; and all cattle, sheep, swine, goats, fallow deer, red deer, bison, horses, mules, and other equines found on such inspection to show symptoms of disease shall be set apart and slaughtered separately from all other cattle, sheep, swine, goats, fallow deer, red deer, bison, horses, mules, or other equines, and when so slaughtered, the carcasses of said cattle, sheep, swine, goats, fallow deer, red deer, bison, horses, mules, or other equines shall be subject to a careful examination and inspection, all as provided by the rules and regulations to be prescribed by the Board as herein provided for.

For the purpose of preventing the inhumane slaughtering of livestock, the Commissioner shall cause to be made, by inspectors appointed for that purpose, an examination and inspection of the method by which cattle, sheep, swine, goats, fallow deer, red deer, bison, horses, mules, and other equines are slaughtered and handled in connection with slaughter in the slaughtering establishments inspected under this law. The Commissioner may refuse to provide inspection to a new slaughtering establishment or may cause inspection to be temporarily suspended at a slaughtering establishment if the Commissioner finds that any cattle, sheep, swine, goats, fallow deer, red deer, bison, horses, mules, or other equines have been slaughtered or handled in connection with slaughter at such establishment by any method not in accordance with subsection (c) of this section until the establishment furnishes assurances satisfactory to the Commissioner that all slaughtering and handling in connection with slaughter of livestock shall be in accordance with such a method.

Either of the following two methods of slaughtering of livestock and handling of livestock in connection with slaughter are found to be humane:

In the case of cattle, calves, fallow deer, red deer, bison, horses, mules, sheep, swine, and other livestock, all animals are rendered insensible to pain by a single blow or gunshot or an electrical, chemical, or other means that is rapid and effective, before being shackled, hoisted, thrown, cast, or cut; or

By slaughtering in accordance with the ritual requirements of the Jewish faith or any other religious faith that prescribes a method of slaughter whereby the animal suffers loss of consciousness by anemia of the brain caused by the simultaneous and instantaneous severance of the carotid arteries with a sharp instrument and handling in connection with such slaughtering.

History.

1969, c. 893, s. 3; 1981, c. 376, s. 1; 1991, c. 317, s. 6; 1995, c. 194, s. 3; 1997-142, s. 6.

§ 106-549.18.
Inspection; stamping carcass.

For the purposes hereinbefore set forth the Commissioner shall cause to be made by inspectors appointed for that purpose, as hereinafter provided, a post mortem examination and inspection of the carcasses and parts thereof of all cattle, sheep, swine, goats, fallow deer, red deer, bison, horses, mules, and other equines, capable of use as human food, to be prepared at any slaughtering, meat-canning, salting, packing, rendering, or similar establishment in this State in which such articles are prepared for intrastate commerce; and the carcasses and parts thereof of all such animals found to be not adulterated shall be marked, stamped, tagged, or labeled, as “Inspected and Passed”; and said inspectors shall label, mark, stamp, or tag as “Inspected and Condemned,” all carcasses and parts thereof of animals found to be adulterated; and all carcasses and parts thereof thus inspected and condemned shall be destroyed for food purposes by the said establishment in the presence of an inspector, and the Commissioner or his authorized representative may remove inspectors from any such establishment which fails to so destroy any such condemned carcass or part thereof, and said inspectors, after said first inspection shall, when they deem it necessary, reinspect said carcasses or parts thereof to determine whether since the first inspection the same have become adulterated and if any carcass or any part thereof shall, upon examination and inspection subsequent to the first examination and inspection, be found to be adulterated, it shall be destroyed for food purposes by the said establishment in the presence of an inspector, and the Commissioner or his authorized representative may remove inspectors from any establishment which fails to so destroy any such condemned carcass or part thereof.

History.

1969, c. 893, s. 4; 1991, c. 317, s. 7; 1995, c. 194, s. 4; 1997-142, s. 7.

§ 106-549.19.
Application of Article; place of inspection.

The foregoing provisions shall apply to all carcasses or parts of carcasses of cattle, sheep, swine, goats, fallow deer, red deer, bison, horses, mules, and other equines or the meat or meat products thereof, capable of use as human food, which may be brought into any slaughtering, meat-canning, salting, packing, rendering, or similar establishment, where inspection under this Article is maintained, and such examination and inspection shall be had before the said carcasses or parts thereof shall be allowed to enter into any department wherein the same are to be treated and prepared for meat food products; and the foregoing provisions shall also apply to all such products which, after having been issued from any such slaughtering, meat-canning, salting, packing, rendering, or similar establishment, shall be returned to the same or to any similar establishment where such inspection is maintained. The Commissioner or his authorized representative may limit the entry of carcasses, part of carcasses, meat and meat food products, and other materials into any establishment at which inspection under this Article is maintained, under such conditions as he may prescribe to assure that allowing the entry of such articles into such inspected establishments will be consistent with the purposes of this and the subsequent Article.

History.

1969, c. 893, s. 5; 1991, c. 317, s. 8; 1995, c. 194, s. 5; 1997-142, s. 8.

§ 106-549.20.
Inspectors’ access to businesses.

For the purposes hereinbefore set forth the Commissioner or his authorized representative shall cause to be made by inspectors appointed for that purpose an examination and inspection of all meat food products prepared in any slaughtering, meat-canning, salting, packing, rendering, or similar establishment, where such articles are prepared for intrastate commerce and for the purposes of any examination and inspection said inspectors shall have access at all times during regular business hours to every part of said establishment; and said inspectors shall mark, stamp, tag, or label as “North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services Inspected and Passed” all such products found to be not adulterated; and said inspectors shall label, mark, stamp, or tag as “North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services Inspected and Condemned” all such products found adulterated, and all such condemned meat food products shall be destroyed for food purposes, as hereinbefore provided, and the Commissioner or his authorized representative may remove inspectors from any establishment which fails to so destroy such condemned meat food products.

History.

1969, c. 893, s. 6; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-549.21.
Stamping container or covering; regulation of container.

When any meat or meat food product prepared for intrastate commerce which has been inspected as hereinbefore provided and marked “North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services Inspected and Passed” shall be placed or packed in any can, pot, tin, canvas, or other receptacle or covering in any establishment where inspection under the provisions of this Article is maintained, the person, firm, or corporation preparing said product shall cause a label to be attached to said can, pot, tin, canvas, or other receptacle or covering, under supervision of an inspector, which label shall state that the contents thereof have been “North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services Inspected and Passed” under the provisions of this Article, and no inspection and examination of meat or meat food products deposited or inclosed in cans, tins, pots, canvas, or other receptacle or covering in any establishment where inspection under the provisions of this Article is maintained shall be deemed to be complete until such meat or meat food products have been sealed or inclosed in said can, tin, pot, canvas, or other receptacle or covering under the supervision of an inspector.

All carcasses, parts of carcasses, meat and meat food products inspected at any establishment under the authority of this Article and found to be not adulterated shall at the time they leave the establishment bear, in distinctly legible form, directly thereon or on their containers, as the Commissioner or authorized representative may require, the information required under subdivision (15) of

G.S. 106-549.15

.

The Board whenever it determines such action is necessary for the protection of the public, may prescribe:

The styles and sizes of type to be used with respect to material required to be incorporated in labeling to avoid false or misleading labeling of any articles or animals subject to this and the subsequent Article;

Definitions and standards of identity or composition for articles subject to this Article and standards of fill of container for such articles not inconsistent with any such standards established under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, or under the Federal Meat Inspection Act, and there shall be consultation between the Commissioner or his authorized representative and the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States prior to the issuance of such standards to avoid inconsistency between such standards and the federal standards.

No article subject to this Article shall be sold or offered for sale by any person, firm, or corporation, in intrastate commerce, under any name or other marking or labeling which is false or misleading, or in any container of a misleading form or size, but established trade names and other marking and labeling and containers which are not false or misleading, and which are approved by the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s authorized representative, are permitted.

If the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s authorized representative has reason to believe that any marking or labeling or the size or form of any container in use or proposed for use with respect to any article subject to this Article is false or misleading in any particular, the Commissioner or the authorized representative may direct that this use be withheld unless the marking, labeling, or container is modified in such a manner as the Commissioner or the authorized representative prescribes so that it will not be false or misleading. If the person, firm, or corporation using or proposing to use the marking, labeling or container does not accept the determination of the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s authorized representative, the person, firm, or corporation may request a hearing, but the use of the marking, labeling, or container shall, if the Commissioner so directs, be withheld pending hearing and final determination by the Commissioner. A person who uses or proposes to use the marking, labeling, or container and who does not accept the determination of the Commissioner may commence a contested case under

G.S. 150B-23

. If directed by the Commissioner, the marking, labeling, or container may not be used pending a final decision.

History.

1969, c. 893, s. 7; 1973, c. 1331, s. 3; 1987, c. 827, s. 35; 1997-261, s. 109; 2015-264, s. 8(b).

§ 106-549.22.
Rules and regulations of Board.

The Commissioner or his authorized representative shall cause to be made, by experts in sanitation, or by other competent inspectors, such inspection of all slaughtering, meat-canning, salting, packing, rendering, or similar establishments in which cattle, sheep, swine, goats, fallow deer, red deer, bison, horses, mules, and other equines are slaughtered and the meat and meat food products thereof are prepared for intrastate commerce as may be necessary to inform himself concerning the sanitary conditions of the same, and the Board shall prescribe the rules and regulations of sanitation under which such establishments shall be maintained; and where the sanitary conditions of any such establishment are such that the meat or meat food products are rendered adulterated, the Commissioner or his authorized representative shall refuse to allow said meat or meat food products to be labeled, marked, stamped, or tagged as “North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services Inspected and Passed.”

History.

1969, c. 893, s. 8; 1991, c. 317, s. 9; 1995, c. 194, s. 6; 1997-142, s. 9; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-549.23.
Prohibited slaughter, sale and transportation.

No person, firm, or corporation shall, with respect to any cattle, sheep, swine, goats, fallow deer, red deer, bison, horses, mules, or other equines, or any carcasses, parts of carcasses, meat or meat food products of any such animals:

Slaughter any of these animals or prepare any of these articles which are capable of use as human food, at any establishment preparing any such articles for intrastate commerce except in compliance with the requirements of this and the subsequent Article;

Slaughter, or handle in connection with slaughter, any such animals in any manner not in accordance with

G.S. 106-549.17(c)

of this Article;

Sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in intrastate commerce:

Any of these articles which (i) are capable of use as human food and (ii) are adulterated or misbranded at the time of sale, transportation, offer for sale or transportation, or receipt for transportation; or

Any articles required to be inspected under this Article unless they have been so inspected and passed; or

Do, with respect to any of these articles which are capable of use as human food, any act while they are being transported in intrastate commerce or held for sale after such transportation, which is intended to cause or has the effect of causing the articles to be adulterated or misbranded.

History.

1969, c. 893, s. 9; 1981, c. 376, s. 2; 1991, c. 317, s. 10; 1995, c. 194, s. 7; 1997-142, s. 10.

§ 106-549.24.
Prohibited acts regarding certificate.

No brand manufacturer, printer, or other person, firm, or corporation shall cast, print, lithograph, or otherwise make any device containing any official mark or simulation thereof, or any label bearing any such mark or simulation, or any form of official certificate or simulation thereof, except as authorized by the Commissioner or his authorized representative.

No person, firm, or corporation shall

Forge any official device, mark or certificate;

Without authorization from the Commissioner or his authorized representative use any official device, mark, or certificate, or simulation thereof, or alter, detach, deface, or destroy any official device, mark, or certificate;

Contrary to the regulations prescribed by the Board, fail to use, or to detach, deface, or destroy any official device, mark, or certificate;

Knowingly possess, without promptly notifying the Commissioner or his authorized representative, any official device or any counterfeit, simulated, forged, or improperly altered official certificate or any device or label or any carcass of any animal, or part or product thereof, bearing any counterfeit, simulated, forged, or improperly altered official mark;

Knowingly make any false statement in any shipper’s certificate or other nonofficial or official certificate provided for in the regulations prescribed by the Board;

Knowingly represent that any article has been inspected and passed, or exempted, under this Article when, in fact, it has, respectively, not been so inspected and passed, or exempted.

History.

1969, c. 893, s. 10.

§ 106-549.25.
Slaughter, sale and transportation of equine carcasses.

No person, firm, or corporation shall sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in intrastate commerce, any carcasses of horses, mules, or other equines or parts of such carcasses, or the meat or meat food products thereof, unless they are plainly and conspicuously marked or labeled or otherwise identified as required by regulations prescribed by the Board to show the kinds of animals from which they were derived. When required by the Commissioner or his authorized representative, with respect to establishments at which inspection is maintained under this Article, such animals and their carcasses, parts thereof, meat and meat food products shall be prepared in establishments separate from those in which cattle, sheep, swine, fallow deer, red deer, bison, or goats are slaughtered or their carcasses, parts thereof, meats or meat food products are prepared.

History.

1969, c. 893, s. 11; 1991, c. 317, s. 11; 1995, c. 194, s. 8; 1997-142, s. 11.

§ 106-549.26.
Inspection of establishment; bribery of or malfeasance of inspector.

The Commissioner or his authorized representative shall appoint from time to time inspectors to make examination and inspection of all cattle, sheep, swine, goats, fallow deer, red deer, bison, horses, mules, and other equines the inspection of which is hereby provided for, and of all carcasses and parts thereof, and of all meats and meat food products thereof, and of the sanitary conditions of all establishments in which such meat and meat food products hereinbefore described are prepared; and said inspectors shall refuse to stamp, mark, tag or label any carcass or any part thereof, or meat food product therefrom, prepared in any establishment hereinbefore mentioned, until the same shall have actually been inspected and found to be not adulterated; and shall perform such other duties as are provided by this and the subsequent Article and by the rules and regulations to be prescribed by said Board and said Board shall, from time to time, make such rules and regulations as are necessary for the efficient execution of the provisions of this and the subsequent Article, and all inspections and examinations made under this Article shall be such and made in such manner as described in the rules and regulations prescribed by said Board not inconsistent with the provisions of this Article and as directed by the Commissioner or his authorized representative. Any person, firm, or corporation, or any agent or employee of any person, firm, or corporation, who shall give, pay, or offer, directly or indirectly, to any inspector, or any other officer or employee of this State authorized to perform any of the duties prescribed by this and the subsequent Article or by the rules and regulations of the Board or by the Commissioner or his authorized representative any money or other thing of value, with intent to influence said inspector, or other officer or employee of this State in the discharge of any duty herein provided for, shall be deemed guilty of a Class I felony which may include a fine not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000); and any inspector, or other officer or employee of this State authorized to perform any of the duties prescribed by this Article who shall accept any money, gift, or other thing of value from any person, firm, or corporation, or officers, agents, or employees thereof, given with intent to influence his official action, or who shall receive or accept from any person, firm, or corporation engaged in intrastate commerce any gift, money, or other thing of value given with any purpose or intent whatsoever, shall be deemed guilty of a Class I felony and shall, upon conviction thereof, be summarily discharged from office and may be punished by a fine not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

History.

1969, c. 893, s. 12; 1991, c. 317, s.12; 1993, c. 539, s. 1298; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995, c. 194, s. 9; 1997-142, s. 12.

§ 106-549.27.
Exemptions from Article.

The provisions of this Article requiring inspection of the slaughter of animals and the preparation of the carcasses, parts thereof, meat and meat food products at establishments conducting such operations shall not

Apply to the slaughtering by any person of animals of his own raising, and the preparation by him and transportation in intrastate commerce of the carcasses, parts thereof, meat and meat food products of such animals exclusively for use by him and members of his household and his nonpaying guests and employees; nor

To the custom slaughter by any person, firm, or corporation of cattle, sheep, swine, fallow deer, red deer, bison, or goats delivered by the owner thereof for such slaughter, and the preparation by such slaughterer and transportation in intrastate commerce of the carcasses, parts thereof, meat and meat food products of such animals, exclusively for use, in the household of such owner, by him, and members of his household and his nonpaying guests and employees: Provided, that all carcasses, parts thereof, meat and meat food products derived from custom slaughter shall be identified as required by the Commissioner, during all phases of slaughtering, chilling, cooling, freezing, packing, meat canning, rendering, preparation, storage and transportation; provided further, that the custom slaughterer does not engage in the business of buying or selling any carcasses, parts thereof, meat or meat food products of any cattle, sheep, swine, goats, fallow deer, red deer, bison, or equines, capable of use as human food, unless the carcasses, parts thereof, meat or meat food products have been inspected and passed and are identified as having been inspected and passed by the Commissioner or the United States Department of Agriculture.

The provisions of this Article requiring inspection of the slaughter of animals and the preparation of carcasses, parts thereof, meat and meat food products shall not apply to operations of types traditionally and usually conducted at retail stores and restaurants, when conducted at any retail store or restaurant or similar retail-type establishment for sale in normal retail quantities or service of such articles to consumers at such establishments. Meat food products coming under this subsection may be stored, processed, or prepared at any freezer locker plant provided such meat food products are identified and kept separate and apart from other meat food products bearing the official mark of inspection while in the freezer locker plant.

In order to accomplish the objectives of this Article, the Commissioner shall exempt any other operations which the Commissioner shall determine would best be exempted to further the purposes of this Article, to the extent such exemptions conform to the Federal Meat Inspection Act and the regulations thereunder.

The slaughter of animals and preparation of articles referred to in paragraphs (a) (2) and (b) of this section shall be conducted in accordance with such sanitary conditions as the Board may by regulations prescribe. Willful violation of any such regulation is a Class 2 misdemeanor.

The adulteration and misbranding provisions of this title, other than the requirement of the inspection legend, shall apply to articles which are not required to be inspected under this section.

History.

1969, c. 893, s. 13; 1971, c. 54, ss. 1, 2; 1991, c. 317, s. 13; 1993, c. 539, s. 799; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995, c. 194, s. 10; 1997-142, s. 13.

§ 106-549.28.
Regulation of storage of meat.

The Board may by regulations prescribe conditions under which carcasses, parts of carcasses, meat, and meat food products of cattle, sheep, swine, goats, fallow deer, red deer, bison, horses, mules, or other equines, capable of use as human food, shall be stored or otherwise handled by any person, firm, or corporation engaged in the business of buying, selling, freezing, storing, or transporting, in or for intrastate commerce, such articles, whenever the Board deems such action necessary to assure that such articles will not be adulterated or misbranded when delivered to the consumer. Willful violation of any such regulation is a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

1969, c. 893, s. 14; 1991, c. 317, s. 14; 1993, c. 539, s. 800; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995, c. 194, s. 11; 1997-142, s. 14.